Utah statutes.
63B-11-102.   Maximum amount -- Projects authorized.
(1)  The total amount of bonds issued under this part may not exceed
$236,000,000.
(2) (a)  Proceeds from the issuance of bonds shall be provided to the division
to provide funds to pay all or part of the cost of acquiring and constructing
the projects listed in this Subsection (2).
(b)  These costs may include the cost of acquiring land, interests in land,
easements and rights-of-way, improving sites, and acquiring, constructing,
equipping, and furnishing facilities and all structures, roads, parking
facilities, utilities, and improvements necessary, incidental, or convenient
to the facilities, interest estimated to accrue on these bonds during the
period to be covered by construction of the projects plus a period of six
months after the end of the construction period, and all related engineering,
architectural, and legal fees.
(c)  For the division, proceeds shall be provided for the following:
PROJECT                                                 AMOUNT
ESTIMATED
DESCRIPTION                                     FUNDED          OPERATIONS
AND
MAINTENANCE
Brigham City Education Center Purchase          $2,741,000
$52,000
Dixie State College
Eccles/Graff Performing Arts Center             $14,396,800
$281,200
Snow College Performing Arts Center             $15,583,000
$200,000
Weber State University Classroom Building
-- Davis Campus                         $20,500,000             $558,200
University of Utah Health Sciences Building     $33,000,000
$676,000
Capitol Restoration Design/Parking Structure    $25,970,000             $ 0
Utah Valley State College Wasatch Campus                $9,587,000
$324,600
Capitol Remodel - Extension Buildings           $40,991,600
$600,000
Classroom Package (CEU, USU, UVSC)              $44,813,500
$1,005,000
Utah Fieldhouse of Natural History                      $5,741,000
$0
Snow College Performing Arts Design             $986,800                $0
Youth Corrections - Washington County           $1,792,700
$272,200
Youth Corrections - Canyonlands                 $3,125,000
$167,500
Utah National Guard - Maintenance Projects      $1,074,700              $0
Utah State University Merrill Library           $800,000                $0
Planning and Design
Courts - Salt Lake Courts                               $475,000
$0
Planning
Courts - Logan Courts                           $11,793,800
$403,300
TOTAL CAPITAL AND
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT                            $233,371,900
(d)  For purposes of this section, operations and maintenance costs:
(i)  are estimates only;
(ii)  may include any operations and maintenance costs already funded in
existing agency budgets; and
(iii)  are not commitments by this Legislature or future Legislatures to fund
those operations and maintenance costs.
(3) (a)  The amounts funded as listed in Subsection (2) are estimates only and
do not constitute a limitation on the amount that may be expended for any
project.
(b)  The board may revise these estimates and redistribute the amount
estimated for a project among the projects authorized.
(c)  The commission, by resolution and in consultation with the board, may
delete one or more projects from this list if the inclusion of that project or
those projects in the list could be construed to violate state law or federal
law or regulation.
(4) (a)  The division may enter into agreements related to these projects
before the receipt of proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter.
(b)  The division shall make those expenditures from unexpended and
unencumbered building funds already appropriated to the Capital Projects Fund.
(c)  The division shall reimburse the Capital Projects Fund upon receipt of
the proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter.
(d)  The commission may, by resolution, make any statement of intent relating
to that reimbursement that is necessary or desirable to comply with federal
tax law.
(5)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the funding of the Capitol
Restoration Design/Parking Structure does not bind this Legislature, or future
Legislatures, to wholly or partially fund the capitol remodel.
